Utah statutes.
31A-19a-204.   Rates open to inspection.
(1)  Rates and supplementary rate information filed under this chapter shall
be open to public inspection at any reasonable time.
(2)  The commissioner shall supply copies to any person on:
(a)  request; and
(b)  payment of a reasonable charge.
